Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.070

Entities—Amenable to criminal process—How.

(1) Whenever an indictment or information shall be filed in any superior court against an entity charging it with the commission of a crime, a summons shall be issued by the clerk of such court, signed by one of the judges thereof, commanding the sheriff forthwith to notify the accused thereof, and commanding it to appear before such court at such time as shall be specified in said summons. Such summons and a copy of the indictment or information shall be at once delivered by such clerk to said sheriff and by the sheriff forthwith served and returned in the manner provided for service of summons upon such entity in a civil action. Whenever a complaint against an entity, charging it with the commission of a crime, shall be made before any district or municipal judge, a like summons, signed by such judge, shall be issued, which, together with a copy of said complaint, shall be delivered to the sheriff at once and by the sheriff forthwith served as herein provided.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "entity" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9A.08.030.

[ 2019 c 211 s 3; 1987 c 202 s 147; 1911 c 29 s 1; RRS s 2011-1.]

NOTES:

Short title—2019 c 211: See note following RCW 10.01.090.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.